src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
!! Acronyms

LEXICON Acronyms
  < [CapCons* CapVow+] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! TÜ, TTÜ, A, AI
  < [CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow^>1] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! ACAI, AEGEE, 
  < [CapCons* CapConsv] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! T, TT, NKVD, 
  < [CapVow   CapConsv] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! AQ, AB, 
!  < [CapVow^>1 [C|Q]] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! AAQ, AAC, ? 
  < [CapVow^>1 CapConsv] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! AAK (+ AcroFiat)
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapNonPairC] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! ABC, 
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! ARK, ASK, (+ AcroFiat) 
  < [CapVow+ CapCons^>1 CapConsv] & Cap^<6 > AcroArmee ;  ! AADRC, AADRV?

  < [CapCons* CapConsc] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! L, XL
  < [CapVow   CapConsc] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! AL, IJ
  < [CapVow^>1 [CapCons - [C|Q]]] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! AAK, (+ AcroArmee)
  < [CapCons+ CapVow+ CapCons] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! MAL, QIJ, MAC
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! TASS, AND, IRC?
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapConsc] & Cap^<6 > AcroFiat ;  ! AADRL
  IŽ AcroFiat ;  ! parallel 
  ACE AcroFiat ; ! parallel
  ASEAN AcroFiat ; !

  < [CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons+ | Y] CapVow] & Cap^<6 & ~[{CHINA}] > AcroPere ;  ! NATO, EKI, EKRE, IATE

  < [CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons+ | Y] CapVow [CapCons - S]] & Cap^<6 > AcroRedel ;  ! UNIX, BAYER
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow CapConsv S] & Cap^<6 > AcroRedel ;  ! UNIKS
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ [CapCons - [L|R]] [L|R]] & Cap^<6 > AcroRedel ;  ! TISL
  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapPairC [L|R]] & Cap^<6 > AcroRedel ;  ! TIMBL

  < [CapCons* CapVow+ CapCons+ CapVow S] & Cap^<6 > AcroEtis ;  ! ETIS

LEXICON AcroArmee 
   +ACR+Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
   +ACR+Sg: GENITIVE ;
      +ACR: Acro1V ;
      +ACR:- Acro1V ;
 @P.POS.ACRMinus@ WithHyphen ;

LEXICON Acro1V 
          :d SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! KT-d
       +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! KT etc
       +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;          ! KT-d
          :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! KT-de etc  
          :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! KT-sid

LEXICON AcroFiat 
   +ACR+Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
      +ACR: Acro1C ;
      +ACR:- Acro1C ;
 @P.POS.ACRMinus@ WithHyphen ;

LEXICON Acro1C 
              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! KEKi etc
              :i SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! KEKi
              :i SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! KEKi
      +Use/Hyp:isse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! KEKisse
              :ide N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! KEKide etc
     +Use/Rare:isid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! KEKisid
              :e PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! KEKe


LEXICON AcroPere 
   +ACR+Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
   +ACR+Sg: GENITIVE ;
      +ACR: Acro2V ;
      +ACR:- Acro2V ;
 @P.POS.ACRMinus@ WithHyphen ;

LEXICON Acro2V 
          :t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! NATOt
       +Sg: ALL_SEM_CASES ;            ! NATO etc
       +Pl:d NOMINATIVE ;            ! NATOd
          :de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! NATO-de etc  
          :sid PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! NATO-sid

LEXICON AcroRedel 
   +ACR+Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
      +ACR: Acro2C ;
      +ACR:- Acro2C ;
 @P.POS.ACRMinus@ WithHyphen ;

LEXICON Acro2C 
              :i N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! UNIXi etc
              :it SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! UNIXit
              :isse SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! UNIXisse
              :ite N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! UNIXite etc
              :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! UNIXeid


LEXICON AcroEtis 
   +ACR+Sg: NOMINATIVE ;
      +ACR: AcroS ;
      +ACR:- AcroS ;
 @P.POS.ACRMinus@ WithHyphen ;

LEXICON AcroS 
          :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;      ! ETISe etc
          :t SG_PARTITIVE ;               ! ETISt
          :esse SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! ETISesse
          :te N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! ETISte etc
          :eid PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! ETISeid

LEXICON WithHyphen        ! ends with a hyphen,
      +ACR:- # ;          ! thus possible only in compounds
